District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.07

Representative program.

(a)

The Director may contract for the services of a representative to provide real estate brokerage or real estate consulting services.

(b)

Each contract for the services of a representative shall be awarded on a competitive basis to a qualified real estate professional in accordance with applicable procurement regulations.

(c)

The representative shall perform an analysis of all aspects of the proposed contract or real estate transaction, including the costs and benefits, and shall negotiate on behalf of the District; provided, that the representative shall not bind the District, and the terms of the contract shall be approved by the Director and, if applicable, by the Council.

(d)

Fees paid for the services of a representative may be paid by either party in a transaction, either as a percentage of the total contract value or a fixed dollar amount, according to the terms of the contract as negotiated between the District and the representative.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1028, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1008 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1022 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1022 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).